Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1040.
do enact as follows:AB1040,11Section 1. 118.07 (1c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1040,2,72118.07 (1c) Every school board, governing board of a charter school 3authorized under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x), and governing body of a private school shall 4ensure that each school under its control has on site an adequate usable supply of 5an opioid antagonist, as defined in s. 450.01 (13v). A supply of an opioid antagonist 6provided under this subsection shall be in a location that is easily accessible at all 7times.AB1040,28Section 2. 165.88 (3n) of the statutes is created to read:AB1040,2,139165.88 (3n) Grants for purchasing an opioid antagonist. From the 10appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (f) and subject to par. (b), the office of school safety 11in the department of justice shall award grants to school boards, governing boards 12of charter schools authorized under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x), and governing bodies of 13private schools for expenditures related to complying with s. 118.07 (1c).AB1040,314Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB1040,2,1715(1) Opioid antagonists; grants. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 16appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (f), the dollar amount 17for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $100,000 for grants under s. 165.88 (3n).AB1040,418Section 4. Effective date.AB1040,2,1919(1) This act takes effect on September 1, 2026.AB1040,2,2020